src/scripts/Russian/pre-reform_to_modern.foma
# Copyright (C) 2021  Dmitry Petrov <dimakrm361@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define ReplaceOldLetters 
і -> и || _ ,, 
ѣ -> е || _ ,, 
ѳ -> ф || _ ,, 
ѵ -> и || _ ;

define RemoveLastHardSign ъ @-> 0 || _ [%-|.#.] ;

define Translate RemoveLastHardSign .o. ReplaceOldLetters;
regex Translate;
